Hawaii statutes.
§431K-2 Risk retention groups chartered in
this State. (a) A risk retention group seeking to be chartered in this
State shall be chartered and licensed as a liability insurance company
authorized by the insurance laws of this State and, except as provided
elsewhere in this chapter, shall comply with all of the laws, rules, and
requirements applicable to these insurers chartered and licensed in this State
and with section 431K-3, to the extent these requirements are not a limitation
on the laws, rules, or requirements of this State. Prior to offering insurance
in any state, each risk retention group shall also submit for approval to the
commissioner a plan of operation or feasibility study and revisions of such
plan or study if the group intends to offer any additional lines of liability
insurance. Immediately upon receipt of an application for charter, the
commissioner shall provide summary information concerning the filing to the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners, including:

(1) The name of the risk retention group;

(2) The identity of the initial members of the group;

(3) The identity of those individuals who organized
the group or who will provide administrative services or otherwise influence or
control the activities of the group;

(4) The amount and nature of initial capitalization;

(5) The coverages to be afforded; and

(6) The states in which the group intends to operate.

Providing notification to the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners is in addition to and shall not be sufficient to
satisfy the requirements of section 431K-3 or any other sections of this
chapter.

(b) New risk retention groups established on
or after July 1, 2016, shall be in compliance with the governance
standards set forth in subsection (c).

(c) By July 1, 2017, existing risk retention
groups shall be in compliance with the following:

(1) The board shall have a majority of independent
directors. The board of directors shall: determine whether a director is
independent and has no material relationship with the risk retention group;
review such determination annually; and maintain a record of the
determinations, which shall be provided to the commissioner annually. If the
risk retention group is reciprocal, then the attorney-in-fact shall be required
to adhere to the same standards regarding independence of operation and
governance as imposed on the risk retention group's board of directors and
subscribers advisory committee[;]

(2) The term of any material service provider
contract entered into with a risk retention group shall not exceed five years.
The contract or its renewal requires approval of a majority of the risk
retention group's independent directors. The board of directors has the right
to terminate a contract at any time for cause after providing adequate notice
as defined in the terms of the contract. Service providers of a reciprocal
risk retention group shall contract with the risk retention group[;]

(3) A risk retention group shall not enter into a
material service provider contract without the prior written approval of the
commissioner[;]

(4) A risk retention group's plan of operation shall
include written policies approved by its board of directors requiring the board
to:

(A) Provide evidence of ownership interest to
each risk retention group member;

(B) Develop governance standards applicable
to the risk retention group;

(C) Oversee the evaluation of the risk
retention group's management, including the performance of its captive manager,
managing general underwriter, or any other person responsible for underwriting,
rate determination, premium collection, claims adjustment and settlement, or
preparation of financial statements;

(D) Review and approve the amount to be paid
under a material service provider contract; and

(E) Review and approve at least annually:

(i) The risk retention group's goals and
objectives relevant to the compensation of officers and service providers;

(ii) The performance of officers and service
providers as measured against the risk retention group's goals and objectives;
and

(iii) The continued engagement of officers and
material service providers[;]

(5) A risk retention group shall have an audit
committee composed of at least three independent board members. A
nonindependent board member may participate in the committee's activities if
invited to do so by the audit committee, but a nonindependent board member
shall not serve as a committee member. The commissioner may waive the
requirement of an audit committee if the risk retention group demonstrates to
the commissioner's satisfaction that having such committee is impracticable and
that the board of directors itself is able to sufficiently perform the
committee's responsibilities. The audit committee shall have a written charter
defining its responsibilities, which shall include:

(A) Assisting board oversight of the
integrity of financial statements, compliance with legal and regulatory
requirements, and qualifications, independence, and performance of the
independent auditor or actuary;

(B) Reviewing annual audited financial
statements and quarterly financial statements with management;

(C) Reviewing annual audited financial
statements with its independent auditor and, if deemed advisable, the risk
retention group's quarterly financial statements;

(D) Reviewing risk assessment and risk
management policies;

(E) Meeting with management, either directly
or through a designated representative of the committee;

(F) Meeting with independent auditors, either
directly or through a designated representative of the committee;

(G) Reviewing with the independent auditor
any audit problems and management's response;

(H) Establishing clear hiring policies
applicable to the hiring of employees or former employees of the independent auditor
by the risk retention group;

(I) Requiring the independent auditor to
rotate the lead audit partner having primary responsibility for the risk
retention group's audit, as well as the audit partner responsible for reviewing
that audit, so that neither individual performs audit services for the risk
retention group for more than five consecutive fiscal years; and

(J) Reporting regularly to the board of
directors[;]

(6) The board of directors shall adopt governance
standards, which shall be available to risk retention group members through
electronic or other means and, upon request, provided to risk retention group
members. The governance standards shall include:

(A) A process by which risk retention group
members elect directors;

(B) Director qualifications,
responsibilities, and compensation;

(C) Director orientation and continuing
education requirements;

(D) A process allowing the board access to
management and, as necessary and appropriate, independent advisors;

(E) Policies and procedures for management
succession; and

(F) Policies and procedures providing for an
annual performance evaluation of the board[;]

(7) The board of directors shall adopt a code of
business conduct and ethics applicable to directors, officers, and employees of
the risk retention group and disclose criteria for waivers of code provisions
to the board of directors, which shall be available to risk retention group
members through electronic or other means and, upon request, provided to risk
retention group members. Provisions of the code shall address:

(A) Conflicts of interest;

(B) Matters covered under the Hawaii
corporate opportunities doctrine;

(C) Confidentiality;

(D) Fair dealing;

(E) Protection and proper use of risk
retention group assets;

(F) Standards for complying with applicable
laws, rules, and regulations; and

(G) Mandatory reporting of illegal or
unethical behavior affecting the operation of the risk retention group[;]

(8) The captive manager, president, or chief
executive officer of a risk retention group shall promptly notify the
commissioner in writing of any known noncompliance with the governance
standards established in this subsection.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

"Independent director" means a
director who does not have a material relationship with the risk retention
group. A person who is a direct or an indirect owner of or subscriber in the
risk retention group, as referenced in the definition of "risk retention
group" in section 431K-1, or who is an officer, a director, or an employee
of the owner and insured unless some other position of the officer, director,
or employee constitutes a "material relationship", is considered
independent. The commissioner shall have the authority to determine whether or
not a director is independent.

A director has a "material
relationship" with a risk retention group if the director or a member of
the director's immediate family:

(1) Receives in any twelve-month period from the risk
retention group or a consultant or service provider to the risk retention group
compensation or other item of value in an amount equal to or greater than five
per cent of the risk retention group's gross written premium or two per cent of
the risk retention group's surplus as measured at the end of any fiscal quarter
falling in the twelve-month period, whichever is greater. This provision also
applies to compensation or items of value received by any business with which
the director or a member of the director's immediate family is affiliated. The
material relationship shall be deemed to exist for one year after the item of
value is received or the compensation ceases or falls below the threshold
established in this paragraph, as applicable;

(2) Is affiliated with or employed in a professional
capacity by a current or former internal or external auditor of the risk
retention group. The material relationship shall be deemed to exist for one
year after the affiliation, employment, or audit ends; or

(3) Is employed as an executive officer of another company
whose board of directors includes executive officers of the risk retention
group unless a majority of the membership of the other company's board of
directors is the same as the membership of the board of directors of the risk
retention group. The material relationship shall be deemed to exist for one
year after the employment or service ends.

"Material service provider" includes
a captive manager, auditor, accountant, actuary, investment advisor, attorney,
managing general underwriter, or other person responsible for underwriting,
determination of rates, premium collection, claims adjustment or settlement, or
preparation of financial statements, whose aggregate annual contract fees are
equal to or greater than five per cent of the risk retention group's annual
gross written premium or two per cent of its surplus, whichever is greater.
"Material service provider" does not mean defense counsel retained by
a risk retention group unless the counsel's annual fees are equal to or greater
than five per cent of a risk retention group's annual gross written premium or
two per cent of its surplus, whichever is greater. [L 1987, c 180, pt of §1; am
L 2016, c 140, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next